Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2910
Approved center; funding; fees.

An approved center may use sources of funds, both public and private, in addition to funds appropriated by the Legislature. An approved center may require each party to pay a fee to help defray costs based upon ability to pay. A person shall not be denied services solely because of an inability to pay the fee.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 10.